Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-210
Examinations; scope; when and where held; reexamination.

The Board of Barber Examiners shall conduct examinations of applicants for certificates of registration to practice as registered barber instructors and registered barbers, not less than four times each year at such time and places as the board may determine. The examination of applicants for certificates of registration as registered barbers shall include both a practical demonstration and a written test, and shall embrace the subjects usually taught in schools of barbering approved by the board. If the applicant fails either the practical demonstration or the written test, reexamination shall be necessary for only the test that was failed. Every student entering a recognized school must have the date of his or her entrance registered with the board.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 8, p. 429;

C.S.1929, § 71-2010;

R.S.1943, § 71-210;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 15, p. 1321;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 18.